lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-suffix_semiFinalE-hop.txt
!======================================================
LEXICON VerbSuffixVI
!  verb-elaborating [VV] and nominalizing [VN] suffixes
!  when suffixing to verb roots that have semi-final -e
!  that can be hopped
!======================================================

                                              VerbInflVI;

-ghhaleg[V.V]:%^%{.m.%}ghhaleg                #;             ! how V! (exclamation)

-@~sf–(g)kau[V.V]:%^%{.sf.%}kau               VerbSuffixI;   ! to have V-ed or been V-ed 
-@~fni[V.V]:%^ni                              VerbSuffixI;   ! to say that one V-s (compound-verbal postbase)

-~(g)aqe[V.V]:%^%{.sf.%}aqe                   VerbSuffixII;  ! to be V-ing; to regularly or repeatedly V
-@lleqe[V.V]:%^lleqe                          VerbSuffixII;  ! to V in the future; will V
-@~fnaqe[V.V]:%^naqe                          VerbSuffixII;  ! to be going to V, to be about to V
-~sf%:(e)sqe[V.V]:%^%{.sf.%}esqe              VerbSuffixII;  ! to ask or tell one to V (compoundverbal postbase)
-+(te)ste[V.V]:%^teste                        VerbSuffixII;  ! to have, make, or let one V (compound-verbal postbase)

-+(te)sug[V.V]:%^tesug                        VerbSuffixIII; ! to want one to V (compoundverbal postbase)
-@~fyug[V.V]:%^yug                            VerbSuffixIII; ! to want to V

-@–nghite[V.V]:%^%{.m.%}nghite                VerbSuffixV;   ! to not V (past-time implication for action verbs and present-time implication for descriptive verbs)
-~:(ng)igate[V.V]:%^%{.sf.%}ngigate           VerbSuffixV;   ! to not V (present-time implication for action verbs)
-+(pete)fte[V.V]:%^fte                        VerbSuffixV;   ! to evidently V or have V-ed

-@~sf–(g)kagh[V.N]:%^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka%{g%}h  NounSuffixIII; ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed
